Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-825
Lottery game retailer; division; sale of tickets; when.

A lottery game retailer shall not engage in business exclusively to sell tickets, except that the director or Tax Commissioner may award a temporary contract to permit a lottery game retailer to sell tickets to the public at special events approved by the Tax Commissioner. Nothing in the State Lottery Act shall prohibit the division or employees of the division from selling tickets to the public.

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 25;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 45.